src/noun-deu-morph.txt
! Die Deklinationsklassen

LEXICON s1m
+N+Msc: s1 ;
s1m; ! remove this stupid line, testing only.
LEXICON s1n
+N+Neu: s1 ;

LEXICON s2m
+N+Msc: s2 ;

LEXICON s2n
+N+Neu: s2 ;


LEXICON s3f
+N+Fem: s3 ;


LEXICON s4m
+N+Msc: s4 ;


LEXICON s4n
+N+Neu: s4 ;

LEXICON s5m
+N+Msc: s5 ;

LEXICON s5n
+N+Neu: s5 ;


LEXICON s6m
+N+Msc: s6 ;

LEXICON s6n
+N+Neu: s6 ;

LEXICON w1m
+N+Msc: w1 ;


LEXICON w2f
+N+Fem: w2 ;


LEXICON w3m
+N+Msc: w3 ;


LEXICON w3n
+N+Neu: w3 ;


LEXICON w4m
+N+Msc: w4 ;


LEXICON w4n
+N+Neu: w4 ;

LEXICON s5f
+N+Sg: NULL ;
+N+Pl:X1 s-n-Pl ;

! Numerus

LEXICON s1
+Sg: sSg ;
+Pl:X1 s-en-Pl ;

LEXICON s2
+Sg: sSg ;
+Pl:X1 s-ern-Pl ;

LEXICON s3
+Sg: NULL ;
+Pl:X1 s-en-Pl ;

LEXICON s4
+Sg: sSg ;
+Pl: s-en-Pl ;

LEXICON s5
+Sg: s-Sg ;
+Pl:X1 NULL ;

LEXICON s6
+Sg: s-Sg ;
+Pl: s-n-Pl ;

LEXICON w1
+Sg: wSg ;
+Pl: wPl ;

LEXICON w2
+Sg: NULL ;
+Pl:  wPl ;

LEXICON w3
+Sg: s-Sg ;
+Pl: wPl ;

LEXICON w4
+Sg: w-ns-Sg ;
+Pl: wPl ;

! Kasus

LEXICON sSg
+Nom: # ;
+Gen:%>s # ;
+Gen:%>es # ;
+Dat: # ;
+Dat:%>e # ;
+Acc: # ;

LEXICON s-en-Pl
+Nom:%>e # ;
+Gen:%>e # ;
+Dat:%>en # ;
+Acc:%>e # ;

LEXICON s-ern-Pl
+Nom:%>e # ;
+Gen:%>e # ;
+Dat:%>ern # ;
+Acc:%>er # ;

LEXICON NULL
+Nom:%> # ;
+Gen:%> # ;
+Dat:%> # ;
+Acc:%> # ;

LEXICON s-Sg
+Nom: # ;
+Gen:%>s # ;
+Dat: # ;
+Acc: # ;

LEXICON s-n-Pl
+Nom:%>e # ;
+Gen:%>e # ;
+Dat:%>en # ;
+Acc:%>e # ;

LEXICON wSg
+Nom:%> # ;
+Gen:%>en # ;
+Dat:%>en # ;
+Acc:%>en # ;

LEXICON wPl
+Nom:%>en # ;
+Gen:%>en # ;
+Dat:%>en # ;
+Acc:%>en # ;


LEXICON w-ns-Sg
+Nom:%>en # ;
+Gen:%>ens # ;
+Dat:%>en # ;
+Acc:%>en # ;
